Hawaii statutes.
[§46-78] Improvement districts, initiation
by the State. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the
respective legislative bodies of the counties may, upon the petition of the
state department of transportation, create, define and establish improvement
districts according to applicable assessment statutes or ordinances, for any
betterment or improvement proposed by the state department of transportation.
The petition of the department of transportation shall include the necessary
surveys, maps, plans and other data for the betterment or improvement. Upon
approval of the petition by the legislative body of the county, the county
shall proceed in the same manner as though the plan for the proposed
construction or improvement had been initiated by the legislative body of the
county on its own motion, provided that the county may abandon the proceedings
prior to adoption of the resolution creating the improvement district.

The provisions of the assessment statutes or
ordinances shall be applicable to the proposed construction or improvement
insofar as practicable, provided that the costs thereof shall be assessed
against the land specially benefited either on a frontage basis, according to
area of the land within the improvement district, or on the basis of assessed
valuation for real property tax purposes, or any combination thereof.

The state department of transportation shall
assume, except for the cost to be borne by the board of water supply of the
county, the cost of construction or improvement which would have been assumed
by the county had the project been initiated by the county, including the costs
and incidentals necessary to process the project, and the costs allocable to
state land and land exempted by the improvement district statutes from the
payment of improvement assessments; provided that where lands owned by the
county, including the board of water supply of the county, form part of the
improvement district, the county or the board of water supply of the county,
whichever is applicable, shall pay the costs allocable to such lands. Nothing
contained herein however, shall be construed to prohibit any county from
participating in the costs of an improvement district which is initiated upon
petition by the department of transportation.

Upon filing the petition for the creation of an
improvement district, the department of transportation shall deposit with the
county an amount adequate to cover the administrative costs of the county. In
addition, the department of transportation shall from time to time upon request
of the county deposit the necessary sums to cover the costs of acquiring land
required for the project. Upon award of any contract, either for the entire
project or separately for the different kinds of work to be performed, the
department of transportation shall deposit with the county the amount the State
is obliged to pay towards the contract price; provided that if the completion
of the contract will extend beyond the fiscal year in which the contract is
executed, the department of transportation may deposit with the county, if the
contract is to be completed during the next succeeding fiscal year, at least
fifty per cent or, if the contract by its terms will not be completed until
beyond the next succeeding fiscal year, at least thirty-three and one third per
cent of the amount the State is obliged to pay toward the contract price. [L
1972, c 201, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next